Utah statutes.
53A-11-401.   Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 53A-11-402 through 53A-11-404:

(1)  "Educator" means a person employed by a public school, but excludes those employed by institutions of higher education.

(2)  "Prohibited act" means an act prohibited by Section 53A-3-501, relating to alcohol; Section 58-37-8, relating to controlled substances; or Section 58-37a-5, relating to drug paraphernalia.

